California statutes. Education Code
(b) Independent institutions of higher education that receive state financial assistance are requested to not ask an applicant to disclose, orally or in writing, information concerning any final administrative decision or final judicial decision described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), including any inquiry about an applicable decision on any employment application, until the institution has determined that the applicant meets the minimum employment qualifications stated in the notice issued for the position.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Applicant” means a person who submits an employment application for an academic, athletic, or administrative position, but does not include a person who is a current employee and is hired or rehired for a different position with the same employer.

(2) “Final administrative decision” means the written determination of whether or not sexual harassment occurred as determined by the decisionmaker following the final investigative report and the subsequent hearing.

(3) “Final judicial decision” means a final determination of a matter submitted to a court that is recorded in a judgment or order of that court.

(4) “Misconduct” means any violation of the policies
 governing employee conduct at the applicant’s previous place of employment, including, but not limited to, violations of policies prohibiting sexual harassment, sexual assault, or other forms of harassment or discrimination, as defined by the employer.

(5) “Sexual harassment” has the same meaning as described in subdivision (a) of Section 66262.5 or, if applicable, as defined in
 Section 106.30 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(6) “Substantiated allegation” means an allegation that has been sustained based upon a burden of proof of at least a preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 673, Sec. 2.   (AB 810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66282.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University annually report to the Legislature on the institution’s efforts to prevent and address sex discrimination on campuses of the California State University.

(b) The California State University shall, on or before December 1 of each year, submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that provides a summation of the activities undertaken by each campus and by the systemwide Title IX office to ensure campus programs and activities are free from sex discrimination. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) (A) The number of sexual harassment reports filed disaggregated by each individual campus and the chancellor’s office.

(B) The number of sexual harassment complaints filed with the campus-based or systemwide Title IX coordinator disaggregated by each individual campus and the chancellor’s office. Sexual harassment complaints shall include all sexual harassment complaints that have been submitted to a Title IX office regardless of whether or not an official investigation has begun.

(2) The number of sexual harassment complaints under investigation, the length of time taken to commence an official investigation after a sexual harassment complaint is filed, and the length of time taken
 from the beginning of an investigation to the completion of a final investigative report, disaggregated by each individual campus and the chancellor’s office as follows:

(A) The length of time taken to commence an official investigation after a sexual harassment complaint is filed shall be grouped in the following categories:

(i) Less than two weeks.

(ii) Two weeks to one month.

(iii) One to three months.

(iv) Three to six months.

(v) Six to 12 months.

(vi) Twelve to 18
 months.

(vii) More than 18 months.

(B) The length of time taken from the beginning of an investigation to the completion of a final investigative report shall be grouped in the following categories:

(i) Less than six months.

(ii) Six to 12 months.

(iii) Twelve to 18 months.

(iv) More than 18 months.

(3) The number of hearings conducted for sexual harassment complaints and the outcomes of those hearings disaggregated by each individual campus and the chancellor’s office.
 The outcomes of those hearings shall be grouped in the following categories:

(A) An informal resolution or settlement was agreed to by the complainant and respondent.

(B) A hearing was convened and a final administrative decision was rendered by the decisionmaker.

(C) A hearing is scheduled or has concluded, but the decisionmaker has not rendered a final administrative decision.

(4) (A) The number of appeals requested by either the complainant or respondent disaggregated by each individual campus and the chancellor’s office.

(B) The outcomes of the appeals identified in
 subparagraph (A) disaggregated by each individual campus and the chancellor’s office.

(C) The outcomes of appeals that occur if an employee respondent elects to appeal a discipline sanction as a result of the complaint through the appeal process provided by the employee’s collective bargaining agreement or pursuant to Sections 89539 and 89542.5.

(5) A list of the personnel disaggregated by campus who are exempt from being responsible employees pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 66281.8.

(c) The California State University shall post the annual reports described in subdivision (b) on its internet website and shall present each report during a public meeting of the
 trustees.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(2) “Final administrative decision” means the written determination of whether or not sexual harassment occurred as determined by the decisionmaker following the final investigative report and the subsequent hearing.

(3) “Final investigative report” means the final report of the summary of relevant evidence provided by the Title IX investigator to the complainant and respondent.

(4) “Sexual harassment” has the same meaning as
 described in Section 66262.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 883, Sec. 1.   (SB 1166)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66282.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California Community Colleges triennially report to the Legislature on the system’s efforts to prevent and address sex discrimination on campuses of the California Community Colleges.

(b) On or before September 1, 2026, and on or before each September 1 thereafter, the governing board of each community college district shall prepare and submit to the chancellor’s office a report on the activities undertaken by the community college district
 to ensure campus programs and activities are free from sex discrimination. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) (A) The number of sexual harassment reports filed disaggregated by each individual campus of the community college district.

(B) The number of sexual harassment complaints filed with the district Title IX office disaggregated by each individual campus of the community college district. Sexual harassment complaints shall include all sexual harassment complaints that have been submitted to a Title IX office regardless of whether or not an official investigation has begun.

(2) The number of sexual harassment complaints under investigation,
 the length of time taken to commence an official investigation after a sexual harassment complaint is filed, and the length of time taken from the beginning of an investigation to the completion of a final investigative report, disaggregated by each individual campus of the community college district as follows:

(A) The length of time taken to commence an official investigation after a sexual harassment complaint is filed shall be grouped in the following categories:

(i) Less than two weeks.

(ii) Two weeks to one month.

(iii) One to three months.

(iv) Three to six months.

(v) Six to 12 months.

(vi) Twelve to 18 months.

(vii) More than 18 months.

(B) The length of time taken from the beginning of an investigation to the completion of a final investigative report shall be grouped in the following categories:

(i) Less than six months.

(ii) Six to 12 months.

(iii) Twelve to 18 months.

(iv) More than 18 months.

(3) The number
 of hearings conducted for sexual harassment complaints and the outcomes of those hearings disaggregated by each individual campus. The outcomes of those hearings shall be grouped in the following categories:

(A) An informal resolution or settlement was agreed to by the complainant and respondent.

(B) A hearing was convened and a final administrative decision was rendered by the decisionmaker.

(C) A hearing is scheduled or has concluded, but the decisionmaker has not rendered a final administrative decision.

(4) (A) The number of appeals requested by either the complainant or respondent disaggregated by each individual campus.

(B) The outcomes of the appeals identified in subparagraph (A) disaggregated by each individual campus.

(C) The outcomes of appeals that occur if an employee respondent elects to appeal a discipline sanction as a result of the complaint through the appeal process provided by the employee’s collective bargaining agreement or pursuant to Sections 87669, 88013, and 88124.

(5) A list of the personnel disaggregated by campus who are exempt from being responsible employees pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 66281.8.

(c) Each community college district shall post the annual reports described in subdivision (b) on its
 internet website and shall present each report during a public meeting of the governing board of the community college district.

(d) On or before December 1, 2026, and on or before December 1 every three years thereafter, the chancellor’s office shall submit a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that provides a summation of the activities undertaken by each community college district and by the systemwide Title IX office to ensure campus programs and activities are free from sex discrimination. The report shall include, but is not limited to, the reports provided by each community college district pursuant to subdivision
 (b).

(e) The chancellor’s office shall post the annual reports described in subdivision (c) on its internet website.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(2) “Final administrative decision” means the written determination of whether or not sexual harassment occurred as determined by the decisionmaker following the final investigative report and the subsequent hearing.

(3) “Final investigative report” means the final report of the summary of relevant evidence provided by the
 Title IX investigator to the complainant and respondent.

(4) “Sexual harassment” has the same meaning as described in Section 66262.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   (SB 1166)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66282.2.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California annually report to the Legislature on the institution’s efforts to prevent and address sex discrimination on campuses of the University of California.

(b) The University of California is requested to submit, on or before December 1 of each year, a report to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that provides a summation of the activities undertaken by each campus and by the systemwide Title IX office to ensure campus programs and activities are free from sex discrimination. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) (A) The number of sexual harassment reports filed disaggregated by each individual campus and the president’s office.

(B) The number of sexual harassment complaints filed with the campus-based or systemwide Title IX coordinator disaggregated by each individual campus and the president’s office. Sexual harassment complaints shall include all sexual harassment complaints that have been submitted to a Title IX office regardless of whether or not an official investigation has begun.

(2) The number of sexual harassment complaints under investigation, the length of time taken to commence an official investigation after a sexual harassment complaint is filed, and the length of time taken from the
 beginning of an investigation to the completion of a final investigative report, disaggregated by each individual campus and the president’s office as follows:

(A) The length of time taken to commence an official investigation after a sexual harassment complaint is filed shall be grouped in the following categories:

(i) Less than two weeks.

(ii) Two weeks to one month.

(iii) One to three months.

(iv) Three to six months.

(v) Six to 12 months.

(vi) Twelve to 18 months.

(vii) More than 18 months.

(B) The length of time taken from the beginning of an investigation to the completion of a final investigative report shall be grouped in the following categories:

(i) Less than six months.

(ii) Six to 12 months.

(iii) Twelve to 18 months.

(iv) More than 18 months.

(3) The number of hearings conducted for sexual harassment complaints and the outcomes of those hearings disaggregated by each individual campus and the president’s office. The
 outcomes of those hearings shall be grouped in the following categories:

(A) An informal resolution or settlement was agreed to by the complainant and respondent.

(B) A hearing was convened and a final administrative decision was rendered by the decisionmaker.

(C) A hearing is scheduled or has concluded, but the decisionmaker has not rendered a final administrative decision.

(4) (A) The number of appeals requested by either the complainant or respondent disaggregated by each individual campus and the Office of the President.

(B) The outcomes of the appeals identified in
 subparagraph (A) disaggregated by each individual campus and the president’s office.

(C) The outcomes of appeals that occur if an employee respondent elects to appeal a discipline sanction as a result of the complaint through the appeal process provided by the employee’s collective bargaining agreement.

(5) A list of the personnel disaggregated by campus who are exempt from being responsible employees pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 66281.8.

(c) The University of California is requested to post the annual reports described in subdivision (b) on its internet website and to present each report during a public meeting of the regents.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Final administrative decision” means the written determination of whether or not sexual harassment occurred as determined by the decisionmaker following the final investigative report and the subsequent hearing.

(2) “Final investigative report” means the final report of the summary of relevant evidence provided by the Title IX investigator to the complainant and respondent.

(3) “President’s office” means the office of the President of the University of California.

(4) “Sexual harassment” has the same meaning as described in Section 66262.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 883, Sec. 3.   (SB 1166)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66283.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as Katie Meyer’s Law.

(b) In order to receive state funds for student financial assistance, the governing board of each community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Directors of the College of the Law, San Francisco, and the Regents of the University of California shall adopt a policy permitting a student to be assisted by an adviser if the student receives a notification of an alleged violation of the public postsecondary educational institution’s student code of conduct. The policy shall include all of the following:

(1) The initial allegation letter that is received by the student shall include a clause informing the student of their right to select an adviser of their choice or to request the public postsecondary educational institution to provide an adviser to the student.

(2) A public postsecondary educational institution may use any of the following to fulfill its obligation to provide an adviser to the student:

(A) A confidential respondent services coordinator.

(B) An agreement with a
 student-based peer support program.

(C) An agreement with an alumni-based support program.

(3) The adviser selected by the student or provided by the public postsecondary educational institution shall be provided training by the institution on the institution’s adjudication procedures for the alleged violation. The training may be provided in an online format, and is not required to, but may, have an in-person or interactive element. To the extent practical, institutions within each segment of public postsecondary education are encouraged to collaborate to develop a training that can be used by more than one institution in that segment.

(4) An adviser, with written permission from the student, shall receive updates along
 with the student during the adjudication process of the alleged violation of the student code of conduct and shall participate in the process as an advocate for the student or in the role of adviser as authorized by Section 66281.8 and Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Adjudication procedures” means a public postsecondary educational institution’s established process to determine if a student has violated the student code of conduct and the established process to respond when violations are sustained.

(2) “Public postsecondary educational institution” means a community college, a campus of the California State
 University, a campus of the University of California, or the College of the Law, San Francisco.

(3) “Segment of public postsecondary education” means the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California.

(4) “Student code of conduct” means any rules or policies adopted by a public postsecondary educational institution on the expectations or standards of student behavior on campus, including, but not limited to, standards related to academics, athletics, and sex discrimination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.   (AB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66284.

(a) It is the policy of the State of California, pursuant to Section 66251, that all persons, regardless of their sex, should enjoy freedom from discrimination of any kind in the postsecondary educational institutions of the state.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 67400, in order to receive state financial assistance, as defined in Section 213, the appropriate governing board or body of each public postsecondary educational institution shall adopt a written policy that, at a minimum, includes, but is not limited to, all of the following provisions:

(A) If an administrator is required to relinquish tenure as a faculty member to become an administrator, then there
 shall be a provision prohibiting retreat rights if any of following have occurred:

(i) The employee is the respondent in a sexual harassment complaint filed with the public postsecondary educational institution and the employee is determined in a final administrative decision to have committed sexual harassment.

(ii) The employee is the respondent in a sexual harassment complaint filed with the public postsecondary educational institution and, before a final administrative decision is made, the employee resigns from their current position.

(iii) The employee is the respondent in a sexual harassment complaint filed with the public postsecondary educational institution and the employee has entered into a settlement with the public postsecondary educational institution.

(B) A provision requiring any administrator or supervisor who elects to provide an official letter of recommendation to an employee of the public postsecondary educational institution to consult with the appropriate entities to determine if the employee is a respondent in a sexual harassment complaint filed with the public postsecondary educational institution.

(C) A provision prohibiting the supervisor or administrator from providing an official letter of recommendation, if it is determined the employee is a respondent in a sexual harassment complaint, and any of the following has occurred:

(i) The employee is determined in a final administrative decision to have committed sexual harassment.

(ii) Before a final administrative decision is made, and while an
 investigation is pending, the employee resigns from their current position.

(iii) The employee enters into a settlement with the public postsecondary educational institution based on the allegations arising from the sexual harassment complaint.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not prohibit a public postsecondary educational institution from adopting a policy on employees’ ineligibility for retreat rights that is more expansive than the provisions described in paragraph (1), provided that the provisions described in paragraph (1) are incorporated into the policy.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 67400, in order to receive state financial assistance, as defined in Section 213, the appropriate governing board or body of each public postsecondary educational institution shall adopt a written policy on settlements and informal
 resolutions of complaints of sexual harassment in cases where the respondent is an employee of the public postsecondary educational institution. The written policy, at a minimum, shall include all of the following provisions:

(1) A provision that prohibits a settlement, an informal resolution, or both, from being offered or entered into if any of following apply:

(A) A complainant of the sexual harassment complaint filed against an employee respondent is a student.

(B) An employee respondent is accused of committing sexual assault, sexual violence, or sexual battery.

(C) The settlement or informal resolution includes a nondisclosure agreement.

(2) A provision that requires the campus chief
 executive officer to approve informal resolutions. The campus chief executive officer shall not delegate that responsibility to a designee.

(3) A provision that requires the campus chief executive officer to preliminarily approve all offers of sexual harassment settlements. The campus chief executive officer shall not delegate that responsibility to a designee.

(4) A provision that requires the governing board of a community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, or the Board of Directors of the College of the Law, San Francisco, as applicable, to approve offers of sexual harassment settlements that have been preliminarily approved by the campus chief executive officer pursuant to paragraph (3).

(d) For purposes of this section, the following
 definitions apply:

(1) “Chief executive officer” means the president of a community college campus or a California State University campus, the chancellor of a University of California campus, or the dean of the College of the Law, San Francisco.

(2) “Complainant” means an individual who is alleged to have been subjected to conduct that could constitute sexual or sex-based harassment.

(3) “Final administrative decision” means the written determination of whether or not sexual harassment occurred as determined by the decisionmaker following the final investigative report and a hearing, if a hearing is either required pursuant to Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) or federal regulations implementing those provisions, or is required by the public postsecondary educational
 institution’s written policy on sex discrimination, including sexual harassment, and related grievance processes. If a party has filed a timely grievance or appeal, “final administrative decision” means after the grievance or appeal decision has been issued.

(4) “Informal resolution” means an agreement between a public postsecondary educational institution and a respondent and complainant for the purpose of resolving a complaint of sexual harassment before a final administrative decision is made.

(5) “Public postsecondary educational institution” means any campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, or the College of the Law, San Francisco.

(6) “Respondent” means the person alleged to have engaged in prohibited conduct under Title IX of the federal
 Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681(a)(3)) or under a public postsecondary educational institution’s written policy on sex discrimination, including sexual or sex-based harassment.

(7) “Retreat rights” means the ability of an administrator who was required to relinquish tenure as a faculty member to become an administrator to return to a faculty position if their administrative role comes to an end.

(8) “Settlement” means an agreement between a public postsecondary educational institution and a respondent for the purpose of resolving a complaint of sexual harassment. “Settlement” does not include a settlement reached in a civil action brought by the respondent against the public postsecondary educational institution.

(9) “Student” means a person who has gained admission and is matriculated at the public
 postsecondary educational institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 813, Sec. 1.   (AB 1905)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Compliance and Enforcement [66290. - 66294.]

66290.

Prior to receipt of any state financial assistance or state student financial aid, a postsecondary educational institution shall provide assurance to the agency administering the funds, in the manner required by the funding agency, that each program or activity conducted by the postsecondary educational institution will be conducted in compliance with this chapter and all other applicable provisions of state law prohibiting discrimination on the basis of sex. A single assurance, not more than one page in length and signed by an appropriate responsible official of the postsecondary educational institution, may be provided for all the programs and activities conducted by a postsecondary educational institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66290.1.

(a) Beginning with the 2017–18 school year, each postsecondary educational institution in this state that claims an exemption pursuant to Section 901(a)(3) of the federal Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681(a)(3)) or has an exemption pursuant to Section 66271 shall disclose to current and prospective students, faculty members, and employees the basis for claiming
 or having the exemption and the scope of the allowable activities provided by the exemption.

(b) The disclosure required in subdivision (a) shall be made in all of the following ways:

(1) The disclosure shall be displayed in a prominent location of the campus or school site. “Prominent location” means that location, or those locations, in the main administrative building or other area where notices regarding the institution’s rules, regulations, procedures, and standards of conduct are posted.

(2) The disclosure shall be included in written materials sent to prospective students seeking admission to the institution.

(3) The
 disclosure shall be provided as part of orientation programs conducted for new students at the beginning of each quarter, semester, or summer session, as applicable.

(4) The disclosure shall be provided to each faculty member, member of the administrative staff, and member of the support staff at the beginning of the first quarter or semester of each school year. The disclosure shall be provided to each new employee upon his or her hire.

(5) The disclosure shall be included in any publication of the institution that sets forth the comprehensive rules, regulations, procedures, and standards of conduct for the institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 888, Sec. 1.   (SB 1146)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

66290.2.

(a) (1) Beginning with the 2017–18 school year, each postsecondary educational institution in this state that claims an exemption pursuant to Section 901(a)(3) of the federal Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681(a)(3)) shall submit to the Student Aid Commission copies of all materials submitted to, and received from, a state or federal agency concerning the granting of the exemption.

(2) Beginning with the 2017–18 school year, each postsecondary educational institution in this state not described in paragraph (1) that has an exemption pursuant to Section 66271 shall submit to the Student Aid Commission its basis for having the
 exemption.

(b) The Student Aid Commission shall collect the information received pursuant to subdivision (a) and post and maintain a list on the commission’s internet website of the institutions that have claimed the exemption with their respective bases for claiming or having the exemption.

(c) Beginning with the 2026–27 school year, the Student Aid Commission shall provide a written notice to students who receive state financial aid regarding whether their postsecondary
 educational institution has an exception pursuant to subdivision (a) on file with the commission. The written notice shall inform students of their right to report discrimination to the United States Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights, and shall include the contact information, including the telephone number, office location, and email address, for the United States Department of Education’s Office for Civil Rights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 490, Sec. 3.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66291.

(a) A community college district shall submit timely, complete, and accurate compliance reports to the chancellor’s office, as that entity may require.

(b) All reports submitted pursuant to this section shall be made available by the educational institution for public inspection during regular business hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66292.

(a) The governing board of each community college district and the chief executive officer of the community college district shall have joint responsibility for ensuring that programs and activities offered by the community college district are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270, including, but not limited to, the prevention of sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5.

(b) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall have responsibility for monitoring each community college district’s compliance with subdivision (a).

(c) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall annually make a presentation
 during a public meeting of the Board of Governors on the state of the California Community Colleges system in ensuring that community college district programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270. The presentation shall include an overview of the chancellor’s office’s efforts in monitoring and ensuring the compliance of each district with providing programs and activities that are free from discrimination, including, but not limited to, the prevention of sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5. The presentation shall include an overview of how community college districts are complying with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and Sections 66281.5, 66281.8, 67385, 67385.7, and 67386.

(d) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall annually review the California Community Colleges system’s regulations on
 nondiscrimination and shall revise the regulations as necessary to ensure that all community college districts are offering programs and activities that are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270.

(e) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or the chancellor’s designee, shall annually present during a public hearing of the Senate Budget and Fiscal Review Subcommittee No. 1 on Education the annual presentation described in subdivision (c). It is the intent of the Legislature that
 this presentation includes an overview of how the California Community Colleges are addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the California Community Colleges system receives state student financial aid.

(f) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, or the chancellor’s designee, shall annually present during a public hearing of the Assembly Budget Subcommittee No. 3 on Education Finance the annual presentation described in subdivision (c). It is the intent of the
 Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the California Community Colleges are addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the California Community Colleges system receives state student financial aid.

(g) As used in this section, “Board of Governors” means the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 5.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66292.1.

(a) The president of each California State University campus shall have the primary responsibility for ensuring that campus programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270, including, but not limited to, the prevention of sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5.

(b) The Chancellor of the California State University shall have responsibility for monitoring the compliance of each California State University campus with subdivision (a).

(c) The chancellor’s office shall annually present a report to the Board of Trustees on the state of the California State University system in ensuring that programs and activities are free from
 discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270. The report shall include an overview of the chancellor’s office’s efforts in monitoring and ensuring the compliance of each campus with providing programs and activities that are free from discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5. The report shall include how each campus is complying with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and Sections 66281.5, 66281.8, 67385, 67385.7, and 67386.

(d) The Chancellor of the California State
 University, or the chancellor’s designee, shall annually present during a public hearing of the Senate Budget and Fiscal Review Subcommittee No. 1 on Education the report described in subdivision (c). It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the California State University is addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the California State University system receives state student financial aid.

(e) The Chancellor of the California State
 University, or the chancellor’s designee, shall annually present during a public hearing of the Assembly Budget Subcommittee No. 3 on Education Finance the report described in subdivision (c). It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the California State University is addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the California State University system receives state student financial aid.

(f) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Board of Trustees” means the Board of Trustees of the California State
 University.

(2) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 6.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66292.2.

(a) The chancellor of each University of California campus shall have the primary responsibility for ensuring that campus programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270, including, but not limited to, the prevention of sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5.

(b) The President of the University of California, or the
 president’s designee, shall have the responsibility for monitoring the compliance of each University of California campus with subdivision (a).

(c) The office of the President shall annually present a report to the Board of Regents on the state of the University of California system in ensuring that programs and activities are free from discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270. The report shall include an overview of the office of the President’s efforts in monitoring and ensuring compliance of each campus with providing programs and activities that are free from discrimination, including, but not limited to, sexual harassment as defined in Section 66262.5. The report shall include how each campus is complying with Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) and Sections 66281.5, 66281.8, 67385, 67385.7, and 67386.

(d) The President of the University of
 California, or the president’s designee, shall annually present the report described in subdivision (c) during a public hearing of the Senate Budget and Fiscal Review Subcommittee No. 1 on Education. It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the University of California is addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the University of California system receives state student financial aid.

(e) The President of the University of
 California, or the president’s designee,
 shall annually present the report described in subdivision (c) during a public hearing of the Assembly Budget Subcommittee No. 3 on Education Finance. It is the intent of the Legislature that the presentation includes an overview of how the University of California is addressing and preventing discrimination based on the characteristics listed in Section 66270 before the University of California system receives state student financial aid.

(f) Section 67400 shall not apply to this section.

(g) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Board of Regents” means the Board
 of Regents of the University of California.

(2) “Office of the President” means the office of the President of the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 7.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)